Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1796 of Title 21, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. "Authorized person" means an individual acting within the
scope of his or her official duties who has received express
authorization from a city, county, or state emergency management
agency, law enforcement agency, or other appropriate governmental
authority to operate, test, or maintain an outdoor warning siren;
and
2. "Outdoor warning siren" means any audible emergency warning
device operated or maintained by a governmental entity or emergency
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4107 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

mana gement agency for the purpose of alerting the public to
emergency conditions, including but not limited to, tornadoes,
severe weather, hazardous material releases, or civil emergencies.
B. It shall be unlawful for any person to:
1. Willfully or knowingly activate, attempt to activate, or
cause to be activated an outdoor warning siren without proper
authorization; and
2. Tamper with, alter, damage, disable, or interfere with any
component of an outdoor warning siren system, including but not
limited to wiring, activation controls, or communication systems,
with the intent to cause unauthorized activation or to impair the
system's function.
C. Any person convicted of violating this section shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment in the county jail for a
term not to exceed one (1) year, or by both such fine and
imprisonment.
D. If the unauthorized activation causes a false emergency
response or public panic, the offense shall be classified as a
felony, punishable by a fine not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars
($5,000.00), or by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
Corrections for a term not to exceed five (5) years, or by both such
fine and imprisonment.
E. This section shall not apply to:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4107 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. Employees, agents, or contractors of a governmental entity
or emergency management authority within the scope of his or her
official duties; or
2. Any person conducting routine testing or maintenance of
outdoor warning sirens under the supervision or written authority of
the jurisdiction responsible for the system.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
April 7, 2026 - DO PASS
















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4107 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)